Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.005

Compensation and expenses of members.

For attendance at meetings of the committee or in attending to such other business of the committee as may be authorized thereby, each legislative member of the committee shall receive the per diem and travel allowances provided for such members by RCW 44.04.120, and each other member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 6; 1969 c 21 s 1; 1951 c 157 s 3.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.